Hawaii statutes.
§708-872 Falsifying business records. (1)
A person commits the offense of falsifying business records if, with intent to
defraud, the person:

(a) Makes or causes a false entry in the business
records of an enterprise;

(b) Alters, erases, obliterates, deletes, removes,
or destroys a true entry in the business records of an enterprise;

(c) Omits to make a true entry in the business
records of an enterprise in violation of a duty to do so which the person knows
to be imposed upon the person by law, other than for the information of the
government, or by the nature of the person's position; or

(d) Prevents the making of a true entry or causes
the omission thereof in the business records of an enterprise.

(2) For purposes of this section:

"Business record" means any record
kept or maintained by an enterprise for the purpose of evidencing or reflecting
its condition or activity.

"Electronic" means relating to
technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical,
electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

"Enterprise" means any entity of one
or more persons, corporate or otherwise, engaged in business, commercial,
professional, industrial, eleemosynary, or social activity.

"Information" includes data, text,
images, sounds, codes, computer programs, software, or databases.

"Record" means information that is
written or printed, or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is
retrievable in a perceivable form.

(3) Falsifying business records is a
misdemeanor. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1993; am L 2014, c 33, §1]

COMMENTARY ON §708-872

Inclusion of false information in an otherwise genuine
document or record is not covered by the forgery offenses. Moreover, only
those private records which are required by law to be kept for the information
of the government are protected by the prohibition against tampering with
public records.[1] "This leaves a large gap in the case of genuine
business records, the content of which has been deliberately falsified or
rendered incomplete as a prelude to working a fraud on potential customers.
Section [708-872] is intended to close this gap."[2] This section is
aimed primarily at conduct preparatory to the commission of fraud, as indicated
by the requisite culpability of intent to defraud, and not the protection of
the integrity of business records as such.

Previous Hawaii law provided no general offense for the
falsification of business records.

SUPPLEMENTAL COMMENTARY ON §708-0872

Act 33, Session Laws 2014, amended this section to apply to
electronic statements, documents, or records. The legislature found that many
government and business records are kept in electronic form. However, the
current law prohibited only the alteration of records kept in written form. In
2000, Hawaii adopted the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, chapter 489E, to
recognize the need to establish the legal validity of electronic records,
signatures, and contracts. Act 33 protected consumers by making relevant
criminal offenses also applicable to electronic statements, documents, or
records. Senate Standing Committee Report No. 3330, House Standing Committee
Report No. 260-14.

__________

§708-872 Commentary:

1. §710-1017.

2. Prop. Mich. Rev. Cr. Code, comments at 294.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next